src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON BEAHTTI_TV       !!≈ * **@CODE@** Bisyllabic i-verbs with Personal Passive, no Der/alla, no Der/adda, Der/halla  (beahtáhallat, báinnáhallat) for speller and no Cmp for noun derivations to avoid e.g. borrabeahttit
 +V+TV:%> BIEHTTIStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsBEAHTTI ;
 +V+TV+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Err/Orth:%>Q4 ENDLEX ;

LEXICON FAHTE_TV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Contracted Verbs with Personal Passive,  no Der/alla, no Der/adda, Der/halla  (fáhtehallin) for speller
 +V+TV:%> DOHPPEStem ;
 +V+TV:»j PASSIVE ;
! +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-PLX:»supmái K ; !just for evenstems
 +V+TV:%> DOHPPEINCH ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsFAHTE ;
 +V+TV:%> NominalFormsV9 ; !Sup


LEXICON GILVI_TV       !!≈ * **@CODE@** only gilvit, to get rid of gilvohallat (for speller reasons).
 +V+TV:%> GILVIStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsDIEHTI ;
 +V+TV+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Err/Orth:%>Q4 ENDLEX ;

LEXICON FAHTI_TV       !!≈ * **@CODE@** (for speller reasons). no fáhttet (fáhtit+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2) because it get mixed up with fáhtet. No deverbal nouns.
 +V+TV:%> FAHTIStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsDIEHTI ;
 +V+TV+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Err/Orth:%>Q4 ENDLEX ;


LEXICON DAHKA_TV       !!≈ * **@CODE@** Like BORRA_TV, but without	dahkat+V+TV+Imprt+Sg1, to get rid of dahkon (for speller reasons)
 +V+TV:%> DAHKAStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsBORRA ;
 +V+TV+PrfPrc+Err/Orth:Q1n K ;


LEXICON FALLA_TV       !!≈ * **@CODE@** fállat, njoarrat,  to get rid of fálastallat, njoarastallat (for speller reasons).
 +V+TV:%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsFALLA ;




LEXICON OAHPPA_TV       !!≈ * **@CODE@** only oahppat. Like BORRA but without Deverbal verb -stuvva (for speller reasons)
 +V+TV:%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/st+V:»W4st MUITALStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:»W5stalla%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V+Use/NG:»W7stalla%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»W5stadda%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/adda+V+Use/NG:»W7stadda%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/Caus+V+TV:»W4stahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/st+V:»W4stasºti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:»W4steasºti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/l+V:»l MUITALStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»W6ladda%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adda+V+Use/NG:»X2ladda%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/Caus+V+TV:»lahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/st+V:»lasºti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:»leasºti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/h+V+TV:»X4h OAHPAHITStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:»Q4halla%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»Q4hadda%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/Caus+V+TV:»X4hahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/st+V:»X4hasºti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:»X4heasºti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der2+Der/halla+V:»X6halla%> RAIMMAHALLAINCH ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der2+Der/halla+V:»X6hadda%> RAIMMAHALLAINCH ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/d+V:»Q8d MUITALStem ;





LEXICON AKTI_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Bisyllabic i-verbs without Personal Passive but with Der/NomAg - for speller reasons, to prevent:
!ákto	áktit+V+IV+Imprt+ConNegII
!ákto	áktit+V+IV+Der1+Der/PassS+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3
!ákto	áktit+V+IV+Der1+Der/PassS+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ConNeg

 +V+IV:%> AKTIStem ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsBOAHTI ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Err/Orth:%>Q4 ENDLEX ;


LEXICON GUHKKA_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** No Imprt+Pl2 on -it, no Imprt+ConNegII and No +Der/NomAg for speller reasons. No Deverbal Verbs either. Bisyllabic a- and u-verbs without Personal Passive
 +V+IV:%> SG3PASSV ;
! +V+IV+Der2+Der/NomAg+N:%>¤» ACTORder ;   GUHKKIT
 +V+IV+Der1+Der2+Der/las+A+Use/-PLX:%>»X2lass LAS ;
< "@P.Px.add@" "+V":0 "+IV":0 "+Der4":» "+Der/NomAct":m "+N":0 > BOAHTINTV   ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/muš+N+Use/-PLX:%>»mušš MUSH ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/meahttun+A+Use/-PLX:%>»W8meahttu MEAHTTUN ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/InchL+V:%>»goahºti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:%>»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prs:%> PrsV ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prt:%> PrtV ;
 +V+IV+Pot+Prs:%>Q7ž PotC ;
 +V+IV+Cond:%> CondV1 ;
 +V+IV+Imprt:%> ImprtV2 ;
 +V+IV+Imprt+Sg1:%>Q3n 12pflag ;       ! bohton
 +V+IV+Imprt+Sg3:%>Q3s 12pflag ;       ! bohtos
 +V+IV+Imprt+Du2:%>Y1 12pflag ;        ! boahtti
 +V+IV+Imprt+Du3:%>Q3ska 12pflag ;     ! bohtoska
 +V+IV+Imprt+Pl1+Dial/-KJ:%>Q3t 12pflag ;       ! bohtot
 +V+IV+Imprt+Pl1+Dial/-GG:%>Y2t 12pflag ;       ! boahttut
! +V+IV+Imprt+Pl2+Err/Orth:%>Y1t ENDLEX ;       ! boahttit GUHKKIT
! +V+IV+Imprt+Pl1:%>Y3t ENDLEX ;      ! boahttut     ! This renders boahttet that are wrong
 +V+IV+Imprt+Pl2+Dial/-KJ:%>Q2t 12pflag ;       ! bohtet
 +V+IV+Imprt+Pl2+Dial/-GG:%>Y3t 12pflag ;       ! boahttet
 +V+IV+Imprt+Pl3:%>Q3set 12pflag ;     ! bohtoset
! +V+IV+Imprt+ConNegII:%>Q3 ENDLEX ; lifted up to Mother lexicas
 +V+IV+Imprt:%>Q6 ImprtSg2 ;
! +V+IV:%> NominalFormsV ;
 +V+IV:%>X1 NominalFormsV1 ;
 +V+IV:%>X4 NominalFormsV2 ;
 +V+IV+Use/NG:%>Q6 NominalFormsV3 ;
 +V+IV:%>X2 NominalFormsV4 ;
! +V+IV+Use/-PLX:%>Q3 NominalFormsV5 ;
 +V+IV+Use/-PLX:%>Y1 NominalFormsV6 ;
 +V+IV:%>X6 NominalFormsV9 ; ! supine forms
! +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsDIEVVA ;  GUHKAS

LEXICON BARDNA_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** "bárdnat" ----> potensialis removed; bártnažan, bártnažat, bártnaš, bártnaža. No Der/NomAg for speller reasons. Bisyllabic a- and u-verbs without Personal Passive but without Der/NomAg. Otherwise like DIEVVA_IV
 +V+IV:%> SG3PASSV ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsDIEVVA ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/InchL+V:%>»goahºti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:%>»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prs:%> PrsV ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prt:%> PrtV ;
! +V+IV+Pot+Prs:%>Q7ž PotC ;
 +V+IV+Cond:%> CondV1 ;
 +V+IV+Imprt:%> ImprtVA ;
 +V+IV:%>X1 NominalFormsV1 ;
 +V+IV:%>X4 NominalFormsV2 ;
 +V+IV+Use/NG:%>Q6 NominalFormsV3 ;
 +V+IV:%>X2 NominalFormsV4 ;
 +V+IV+Use/-Spell:%>Q3 NominalFormsV5 ;
 +V+IV:%>Y1 NominalFormsV6 ;
 +V+IV:%>X6 NominalFormsV9 ; ! supine forms
 +V+TV:%> DeverbalNounsRAIMMAHALLA ;


LEXICON DUSSA_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Bisyllabic a- and u-verbs without Passive and Der/NomAg, get rid of duššo
 +V+IV:%>  BOAHTIINCH ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsDIEVVA ;
 +V+IV+PrfPrc+Err/Orth-a-á:Q1n K ;


!!!! 2e. lexicas for special compound behavious
!    --------------------------------------------



LEXICON DIEHTISHORT_TV       !!≈ * **@CODE@** Short action noun compound-form: neasken-
 +V+TV:%> DIEHTISHORTStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsDIEHTI ;

LEXICON DIEHTILONGSHORT_TV       !!≈ * **@CODE@** Long and short action noun compound-form, savdnjen-/savdnjin-
 +V+TV:%> DIEHTILONGSHORTStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsDIEHTI ;
 +V+TV+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Err/Orth:%>Q4 ENDLEX ;

LEXICON BAHCCI_TV       !!≈ * **@CODE@** bahčit. Long and short actio compound-form. No NomAg (Actor) compound, for speller reasons
 +V+TV:%> BAHCCIStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsDIEHTI ;
 +V+TV+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Err/Orth:%>Q4 ENDLEX ;

LEXICON BOAHTILONGSHORT_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Long and short action noun compound-form
 +V+IV:%> BOAHTILONGSHORTStem ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsBOAHTI ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Err/Orth:%>Q4 ENDLEX ;




!!!! 2f. other special lexicas
!    --------------------------------------------




LEXICON MAHTI_TV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Bisyllabic Verbs without Personal Passive but with Acc obj.
 +V+TV:%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsBOAHTI ;
! This lexicon goes as BOAHTI except for the TV tag.
! The reason is that máhtit takes acc objects, but does not have passive.







!! ## Intermediate lexica for even-syllable verbs
!  - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -


LEXICON DIEHTIStem
 :Y7j PASSIVE ;
 +Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-PLX:»Y7supmái K ;
 +Der1+Der/PassS+V+IV:»Y7  OT-PASSIVE ;
 DIEHTIINCH ;
 
LEXICON DOALVUStem
 :Y7j PASSIVE ;
 +Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-PLX:»Y7supmái K ;
 +Der1+Der/PassS+V+IV:»Y7  OT-PASSIVE ;
 DOALVUINCH ;
 
 
